Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6124.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-130. Special plate for Cranston Cares.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available
special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit entity Cranston Cares. The plates
shall be designed to reference the not-for-profit entity Cranston Cares.
(b) The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the
vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the
registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be
removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate
for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with § 31-3-9. The registration certificate
shall be in effect for the special plate.
(c) The Cranston Cares motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle
plates and shall be designed by Cranston Cares in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles,
with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.
(d) The Cranston Cares plates shall be subject to compliance with § 31-3-117 relating to
the number of minimum prepaid orders of plates per plate type (i.e., passenger, commercial, etc.)
and any required payment. The Cranston Cares plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order
requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by Cranston Cares and shall not be submitted

to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the
proper paper work submitted to the division.
(e) The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other
procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(f) In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Cranston Cares
plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.
(g) The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty
dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00)
shall be distributed annually to Cranston Cares for community initiatives.
(h) A ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated
to Cranston Cares.
(i) In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Cranston Cares plates,
Cranston Cares must use any Rhode Island-sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island-
based charitable organizations.
(j) Cranston Cares will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such
monies are distributed.
(k) There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Cranston Cares plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002473
========
LC002473 - Page 2 of 3